Idaho, session 2026, H0922.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. In addition to any other appropriation provided by law,
there is hereby appropriated to the State Board of Education and the Board
of Regents of the University of Idaho for College and Universities and the
Office of the State Board of Education the following amounts to be expended
according to the designated programs and expense classes from the listed
funds for the period July 1, 2026, through June 30, 2027:
FOR FOR
PERSONNEL OPERATING
COSTS EXPENDITURES TOTAL
I. BOISE STATE UNIVERSITY:
FROM:
General
Fund $134,800 $4,600 $139,400
II. IDAHO STATE UNIVERSITY:
FROM:
General
Fund $95,200 $2,600 $97,800
CharitableInstitutionsEndowmentIncome
Fund 113,000 113,000
NormalSchoolEndowmentIncome
Fund 260,100 0 260,100
TOTAL $468,300 $2,600 $470,900


FOR FOR
PERSONNEL OPERATING
COSTS EXPENDITURES TOTAL
III. LEWIS-CLARK STATE COLLEGE:
FROM:
NormalSchoolEndowmentIncome
Fund $355,800 $355,800
IV. UNIVERSITY OF IDAHO:
FROM:
General
Fund $262,300 $11,000 $273,300
AgriculturalCollegeEndowmentIncome
Fund 120,000 120,000
ScientificSchoolEndowmentIncome
Fund 380,400 380,400
University Endowment Income
Fund 0 680,400 680,400
TOTAL $262,300 $1,191,800 $1,454,100
GRAND TOTAL $865,400 $1,554,800 $2,420,200
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the
appropriation to the State Board of Education and the Board of Regents of the
University of Idaho for College and Universities and the Office of the State
Board of Education is hereby reduced by the following amounts from the Gen-
eral Fund from operating expenditures for the period July 1, 2026, through
June 30, 2027:
FROM:
Boise State University $295,300
Idaho State University 186,300
Lewis-Clark State College 61,100
University of Idaho 210,200
TOTAL $752,900
SECTION 3. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.